Utah statutes.
11-46-207.   Penalties.

(1) (a)  A person who knowingly commits any of the violations in Subsection (2) is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $250 on a first violation, and a civil penalty of not less than $500 on any second or subsequent violation.

(b)  The administrator of the animal shelter imposes the civil penalties under this section.

(2)  A person is subject to the civil penalties under Subsection (1) who:

(a)  falsifies any proof of sterilization submitted for the purpose of compliance with this part;

(b)  provides to an animal shelter or a licensed veterinarian inaccurate information regarding ownership of any animal required to be submitted for sterilization under this part;

(c)  submits to an animal shelter false information regarding sterilization fees or fee schedules; or

(d)  issues a check for insufficient funds for any sterilization deposit required of the person under this part.

(3)  A person who contests a civil penalty imposed under this section is entitled to an administrative hearing that provides for the person's rights of due process.

(4)  All penalties collected under this section shall be retained by the animal shelter imposing the penalties, to be used solely for the purposes of Subsection 11-46-204(4).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 130, 2011 General Session

